test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-roqvz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - roʼvz: # Noun 167 'eng /est rahvas/fin' - full paradigm
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Nom: [roʼvz, rovz]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Gen: [roʼv, rov]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Par: [roʼvztõ, rovztõ]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Dat: [roʼvvõn, rovvõn]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Ins: [roʼvkõks, rovkõks]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Ill: [roʼvvõ, rovvõ]
     roʼvz+N+Sg+Ela: [roʼvstõ, rovstõ]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Nom: [roʼvd, rovd]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Gen: [roʼvd, rovd]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Par: [roʼvḑi, rovḑi]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Dat: [roʼvdõn, rovdõn]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Ins: [roʼvdkõks, rovdkõks]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Ill: [roʼvži, rovži]
     roʼvz+N+Pl+Ela: [roʼvšti, rovšti]
